Hawaii statutes.
§457-8.6 Prescriptive authority for
advanced practice registered nurses. (a) The board shall grant
prescriptive authority to qualified advanced practice registered nurses and
shall designate the requirements for advanced nursing practice related to prescriptive
authority. The board shall determine the exclusionary formulary for qualified
advanced practice registered nurses who are granted prescriptive authority.

(b) The board shall establish requirements for
advanced practice registered nurses' education, experience, and national
certification pursuant to rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91.

(c) Advanced practice registered nurses shall
be considered qualified if they have met the requirements of section
457-8.5(a), and have met the advanced pharmacology requirements for initial
prescriptive authority pursuant to rules adopted by the board. Only qualified
advanced practice registered nurses authorized to diagnose, prescribe, and
institute therapy or referrals of patients to health care agencies, health care
providers, and community resources and, only as appropriate to the practice
specialty in which the advanced practice registered nurse is qualified, may:

(1) Prescribe and administer over the counter drugs,
legend drugs, and controlled substances pursuant to this chapter and to chapter
329 and request, receive, and dispense manufacturers' prepackaged samples of
over the counter drugs, and non-controlled legend drugs to patients under their
care; provided that an advanced practice registered nurse shall not request,
receive, or sign for professional controlled substance samples;

(2) Prescribe, order, and dispense medical devices
and equipment; and

(3) Plan and initiate a therapeutic regimen that
includes nutritional, diagnostic, and supportive services including home health
care, hospice, and physical and occupational therapy. [L 1994, c 278, §1; am L
2002, c 192, §§1, 5; am L 2003, c 3, §27; am L 2004, c 88, §§5, 8 and c 150,
§§1, 2; am L 2005, c 30, §1; am L 2008, c 9, §3; am L 2009, c 169, §10; am L
2010, c 57, §6; am L 2011, c 110, §2; am L 2016, c 92, §2 and c 183, §8]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next